Utah statutes.
17B-2a-907.   Adding a new service within a service area.
A service area may begin to provide within the boundaries of the service area
a service that it had not previously provided by using the procedures set
forth in Chapter 1, Part 2, Creation of a Local District, for the creation of
a service area as though a new service area were being created to provide that
service.
